Ohio, session 136, HB646.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Commission" means the Data Center Study Commission. (2) "Data center" means a physical facility equipped with, or connected to, one or more computers that is used for processing or transmitting data. (B)(1) There is created, within the Department of Development, the Data Center Study Commission, which shall consist of the following members: (a) Three members appointed by the Governor consisting of the following: (i) One member with knowledge of data center operations; (ii) One member with knowledge of agriculture; (iii) One member with knowledge of county government. (b) Five members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives consisting of the following: (i) One member with knowledge of rural electric cooperatives; (ii) One member with knowledge of water and environmental impacts of data centers; (iii) One member with knowledge of townships; (iv) One member who is a member of the majority party of the House of Representatives; (v) One member who is a member of the minority party of the House of Representatives. The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall consult with the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives regarding the appointment of a member of the minority party of the House of Representatives. (c) Five members appointed by the President of the Senate consisting of the following: (i) One member with knowledge of municipalities; (ii) One member with knowledge of public utilities; (iii) One member with knowledge of economic development and tax incentives; (iv) One member who is a member of the majority party of the Senate; (v) One member who is a member of the minority party of the Senate. The President of the Senate shall consult with the Minority Leader of the Senate regarding the appointment of a member of the minority party of the Senate. (2)(a) The member who is a member of the majority party of the House of Representatives shall serve as a Co-chairperson of the Commission. (b) The member who is a member of the majority party of the Senate shall serve as a Co-chairperson of the Commission. (3) Members shall serve until any of the following occur, as applicable: (a) The member resigns or is no longer able to fulfill the duties of the Commission; (b) The member is removed from the Commission by the officer that appointed that member; (c) The Commission is dissolved under this section. (4) Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as for original appointments. (5) Members of the Commission shall serve without compensation. (C)(1) The first meeting of the Commission shall occur not more than forty-five days after the effective date of this section, at a date and time set by the Co-chairpersons. (2) The Commission shall hold not less than four public meetings as follows: (a) Not less than two public meetings shall be held for hearing public testimony regarding the topics described in division (D) of this section. (b) Not less than two public meetings shall be held for hearing invited testimony from experts regarding the topics described in division (D) of this section. (D) The Commission shall examine all of the following concerning data centers: (1) Environmental impact; (2) Effect on the electrical grid, including on behind the meter electric supply and on consumer utility rates; (3) Water usage, wastewater discharge, and impact on the local water supply; (4) Noise pollution; (5) Light pollution; (6) Impact on the local economy; (7) Impact on farmland; (8) Value to national security and the development of artificial intelligence; (9) Reports of foreign propaganda intended to create opposition to data centers; (10) Any other relevant topics determined by the Commission. (E) The Commission shall submit a report of its findings and any legislative recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly in accordance with division (B) of section 101.68 of the Revised Code not more than six months after the effective date of this section. The report shall include nonbinding best practices and considerations as a guide for local decision-making bodies. (F) The Commission terminates after issuing the report required by this section.